Maryland, session 2025, HB1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–701.2.
(a) There is a commercial blue and flathead catfish finfish trotline license.
(b) (1) The license authorizes the holder to catch for sale blue and flathead
catfish in the tidal waters of the State using a finfish trotline, as defined in Department
regulations.
(2) (I) A licensee shall fish in accordance with Department regulations.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1249*

HOUSE BILL 1249
(II) FOR CATCHING BLUE CATFISH, THE DEPARTMENT’S
REGULATIONS:
1. SHALL ESTABLISH A PILOT PROGRAM AUTHORIZING
THE USE OF ELECTROFISHING;
2. SHALL AUTHORIZE THE USE OF FINFISH TROTLINES
OF UP TO 2,400 FEET IN LENGTH;
3. MAY NOT SET A LIMIT ON THE NUMBER OF HOOKS
USED; AND
4. SHALL AUTHORIZE THE USE OF HOOKS THAT ARE NOT
CORRODIBLE.
(c) A person who wishes to obtain the license shall complete and submit an
application for the license to the Department or any person designated by the Department.
(d) An applicant for the license does not need to hold a tidal fish license under §
4–701 of this subtitle to be eligible for the license.
(e) The term of the license is 1 year from September 1 through August 31 the
following year.
(f) The annual license fee is $15.
(g) A licensee may not transfer a license issued under this section.
(h) A licensee shall have a commercial blue and flathead catfish finfish trotline
license in the licensee’s possession when the licensee fishes under the license.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before September 1,
2025, the Department of Agriculture shall issue a report to the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, outlining needs and best
practices for:
(1) collecting harvested blue catfish;
(2) processing harvested blue catfish;
(3) marketing blue catfish to private and government merchants; and
(4) financing these needs and best practices.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has

HOUSE BILL 1249 3
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.